Missouri, session 2026, HB2222.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 226.030, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 226.030, to read as follows:
226.030. 1. Beginning January 1, 2027, the highways and transportation
commission shall consist of [six members] one member from each congressional district,
who shall be appointed by the governor[, by and with the advice and consent of the senate,] as
provided under subsection 6 of this section, with not more than [three] half thereof to be
members of the same political party; except that, if there is an odd number of members
serving on the commission, no more than one-half plus one shall be of the same political
party. In the event a member of the commission is found by unanimous vote of the other
commissioners to have moved such commissioner's residence from the congressional
district from which such commissioner was appointed, the office of such commissioner
shall be forfeited and considered vacant. Each commissioner shall be a taxpayer and
resident of state for at least five years prior to his appointment. Any commissioner may be
removed by the governor if fully satisfied of his inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct
in office. Any commissioner shall be removed by the governor upon an affirmative vote
by two-thirds of the house of representatives and two-thirds of the senate to remove
such commissioner. Commissioners appointed pursuant to this section shall be appointed for
terms of six years, except as otherwise provided in this subsection. Upon the expiration of
each of the foregoing terms of these commissioners a successor shall be appointed for a term
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2222 2
of six years or until his successor is appointed and qualified which term of six years shall
thereafter be the length of term of each member of the commission unless removed as above
provided. The members of the commission shall receive as compensation for their services
twenty-five dollars per day for the time spent in the performance of their official duties, and
also their necessary traveling and other expenses incurred while actually engaged in the
discharge of their official duties. Members whose terms otherwise expire December 1, 2003,
shall serve with terms expiring March 1, 2004, and new members or the members reappointed
shall be appointed for terms expiring March 1, 2005; a member whose term otherwise expires
December 1, 2005, shall serve with a term expiring March 1, 2007; a member whose term
otherwise expires December 1, 2007, shall serve with a term expiring March 1, 2009; and one
member whose term otherwise expires October 13, 2007, shall serve with a term expiring
March 1, 2007; and one member whose term otherwise expires October 13, 2007, shall serve
with a term expiring March 1, 2009. If a vacancy occurs in any term of a commissioner due
to death, resignation, or removal, a successor shall be appointed for only the remainder of the
unexpired term.
2. The two members of the commission, one each from opposing political parties,
who have the most seniority in commission service shall serve as commission leadership with
one member as chair and the other member as vice chair, respectively, for terms ending
March 1, 2005. The commission shall elect one of the members as chair and the other as vice
chair. Effective March 1, 2005, the commission shall elect the two members of the
commission, one from each opposing political party who has the most seniority in
commission service, who shall serve as commission leadership with one member as chair and
the other member as vice chair, respectively, for one year. At the end of such year, the
members currently serving as chair and vice chair shall have the option to rotate positions,
and the member currently serving as vice chair may serve as chair, and vice versa. Thereafter,
commission leadership shall continue to rotate accordingly with the two members from
opposing political parties who have the most seniority in terms of commission service being
elected by the commission to serve as commission leadership. If one of the commission
leadership offices becomes vacant due to death, resignation, removal, or [refuses] refusal to
serve before the one-year leadership term expires, the commission shall elect one of its
members that is of the same political party as the vacating officer to serve the remainder of
the vacating officer's leadership term. Such election shall not prohibit that member from later
serving as chair and vice chair when such member's seniority in commission service qualifies
him or her for those offices as provided in this subsection.
3. No more than one-half of the members of the commission shall be of the same
political party. The selection and removal of all employees of the department of
transportation shall be without regard to political affiliation.

HB 2222 3
4. The present members of the commission shall continue to serve as members of the
commission for the remainder of the terms for which they were appointed, except as provided
in subsection 1 of this section.
5. Any member reappointed shall only be eligible to serve as chair or vice chair
during the final two years of such member's reappointment.
6. (1) On or after January 1, 2027, the governor shall appoint two additional
members to the highways and transportation commission from a list of six nominees
submitted by the general assembly prior to such date. The list of nominees submitted to
the governor shall be selected by the general assembly and approved prior to such
submission by a two-thirds vote of the house and a two-thirds vote of the senate.
(2) Additional appointments to the commission after the initial appointments
made under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be made by the same method; each
time there is a vacancy on the commission, the general assembly shall submit to the
governor the names of three nominees who meet the requirements of subsection 1 of this
section and whose nomination has been approved by a two-thirds vote of the house and
a two-thirds vote of the senate. The governor shall be required to make appointments to
the commission from the nomination list submitted by the general assembly.
7. No member of the commission shall accept directly or indirectly a gift of any
tangible or intangible item, service, or thing of value from any paid lobbyist or lobbyist
principal. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent individuals from receiving gifts,
family support, or anything of value from those related to them within the fourth degree
by blood or marriage.
✔